Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-512.16
Title IV-D
child support order; review of health care coverage provisions.

The county attorney or authorized attorney shall review the
health care coverage provisions contained
in any child support order which is subject to review under section 43-512.12
and shall include in any application for modification a request that the court
order health care coverage or cash medical support as
provided in subsection (2) of section 42-369.

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 12.